Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-302 Rehabilitation orders.
(a) An order to rehabilitate the business of a domestic insurer, or an alien
insurer domiciled in this State, shall appoint the commissioner and the
commissioner's successors in office the rehabilitator, and shall direct the
rehabilitator forthwith to take possession of the assets of the insurer, and to
administer them under the general supervision of the court. The filing or
recording of the order with the clerk of the circuit court of the first
judicial circuit or at the bureau of conveyances, shall impart the same notice
as evidence of title. The order to rehabilitate the insurer shall by operation
of law vest title to all assets of the insurer in the rehabilitator.

(b) Any order issued under this section shall
require accounting to the court by the rehabilitator. Accountings shall be at
such intervals as the court specifies in its order.

(c) Entry of an order of rehabilitation shall
not constitute an anticipatory breach of any contracts of the insurer. [L 1987,
c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next